Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1638
Appeal; procedure.

Any person aggrieved or adversely affected by any final board action or by any penalty imposed by the board may appeal such action or penalty, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 38;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 164;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2838;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 38.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.